Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-627.01
Adoptive birth certificate; decree of adoption of child born in another state; notice of entry of decree.

Whenever a decree of adoption is entered in any court of competent jurisdiction in the State of Nebraska, as to a child born in another state, the judge of the court in which such decree is entered shall, on forms to be furnished by the department, notify the agency having authority to issue adoptive birth certificates in the state in which such child was born for the purpose of securing the issuance of an adoptive birth certificate from the state of birth.

Laws 1961, c. 342, § 3, p. 1094;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 539;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 158;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 432.